Maine, session 132, LD1510.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §82-A is enacted to read:
§82-A. License application review
The board, when considering an application for a license required pursuant to section
82 for an emergency medical services person, emergency medical services ambulance
operator and emergency medical dispatcher pursuant to this chapter, is subject to the time
frames and reporting requirements provided in this section.
1. Decision on applications. Except as provided in subsection 2, the board shall grant
or deny an application for a license no later than 30 calendar days after receipt of a license
application that has been determined to be complete. If the application is determined to be
incomplete, the board shall notify the applicant no later than 10 days after making that
determination. The 30-day time frame for the board to consider the application starts over
when the applicant provides the necessary information for the board to determine the
application complete.
2. Extraordinary circumstances. In the event of a state of emergency declared by the
Governor pursuant to Title 37-B, section 742 or if the number of applications received
cannot reasonably be processed as required by subsection 1, the board may take an
additional 15 calendar days to decide to grant or deny a license application.
3. Report to the Legislature. Beginning February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter,
the board shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over emergency medical services matters regarding applications reviewed
pursuant to this section. The report must include:
A. The number of applications received by the board and the number of licenses
granted and applications denied pursuant to subsection 1;
B. The average number of days between receipt of a complete application and
notification to the applicant of the board's decision pursuant to subsection 1; and
C. The number of applications subject to an extended review pursuant to subsection 2.
4. Failure of the board to meet time frames. If the commissioner determines that the
board is unable to comply with the time frames provided in this section, notwithstanding
any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the commissioner shall review the board's
actions and implement necessary corrections, including, but not limited to, transferring the
duties of the board to consider license applications for emergency medical services persons,
emergency medical services ambulance operators and emergency medical dispatchers to
the commissioner.
5. Rules. The board shall adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.